North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 8. Hearsay.

Rule 801.
Definitions and exception for admissions of a party-opponent.

The following definitions apply under this Article:

Statement. — A “statement” is (1) an oral or written assertion or (2) nonverbal conduct of a person, if it is intended by him as an assertion.

Declarant. — A “declarant” is a person who makes a statement.

Hearsay. — “Hearsay” is a statement, other than one made by the declarant while testifying at the trial or hearing, offered in evidence to prove the truth of the matter asserted.

Exception for Admissions by a Party-Opponent. — A statement is admissible as an exception to the hearsay rule if it is offered against a party and it is (A) his own statement, in either his individual or a representative capacity, or (B) a statement of which he has manifested his adoption or belief in its truth, or (C) a statement by a person authorized by him to make a statement concerning the subject, or (D) a statement by his agent or servant concerning a matter within the scope of his agency or employment, made during the existence of the relationship or (E) a statement by a coconspirator of such party during the course and in furtherance of the conspiracy.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 801, except for subdivision (d) which is discussed below.

Subdivision (a) defines “statement” for purposes of the hearsay rule. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The definition of ‘statement’ assumes importance because the term is used in the definition of hearsay in subdivision (c). The effect of the definition of ‘statement’ is to exclude from the operation of the hearsay rule all evidence of conduct, verbal or nonverbal, not intended as an assertion. The key to the definition is that nothing is an assertion unless intended to be one.

It can scarcely be doubted that an assertion made in words is intended by the declarant to be an assertion. Hence verbal assertions readily fall into the category of ‘statement’. Whether nonverbal conduct should be regarded as a statement for purposes of defining hearsay requires further consideration. Some nonverbal conduct, such as the act of pointing to identify a suspect in a lineup, is clearly the equivalent of words, assertive in nature, and to be regarded as a statement. Other nonverbal conduct, however, may be offered as evidence that the person acted as he did because of his belief in the existence of the condition sought to be proved, from which belief the existence of the condition may be inferred. This sequence is, arguably, in effect an assertion of the existence of the condition and hence properly includable within the hearsay concept. * * * Admittedly evidence of this character is untested with respect to the perception, memory, and narration (or their equivalents) of the actor, but the Advisory Committee is of the view that these dangers are minimal in the absence of an intent to assert and do not justify the loss of the evidence on hearsay grounds. No class of evidence is free of the possibility of fabrication, but the likelihood is less with nonverbal than with assertive verbal conduct. The situations giving rise to the nonverbal conduct are such as virtually to eliminate questions of sincerity. Motivation, the nature of the conduct, and the presence or absence of reliance will bear heavily upon the weight to be given the evidence. * * * Similar considerations govern nonassertive verbal conduct and verbal conduct which is assertive but offered as a basis for inferring something other than the matter asserted, also excluded from the definition of hearsay by the language of subdivision (c).”

Subdivision (a) differs from current North Carolina law by excluding from the hearsay rule all evidence of conduct, verbal or nonverbal, not intended as an assertion. Some North Carolina cases have barred evidence of conduct even though the conduct was nonassertive. In other cases, comparable evidence has been admitted, either as nonhearsay or without noticing its possible hearsay nature.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 142 (1982).

With respect to subdivision (a), the Advisory Committee’s Note also states:

“When evidence of conduct is offered on the theory that it is not a statement, and hence not hearsay, a preliminary determination will be required to determine whether an assertion is intended. The rule is so worded as to place the burden upon the party claiming that the intention existed; ambiguous and doubtful cases will be resolved against him and in favor of admissibility. The determination involves no greater difficulty than many other preliminary questions of fact.”

Subdivision (b), which defines declarant as a person who makes a statement, is consistent with North Carolina practice.

Subdivision (c) defines hearsay as a statement, other than one made by the declarant while testifying at the trial or hearing, offered to prove the truth of the matter asserted. The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The definition follows along familiar lines in including only statements offered to prove the truth of the matter asserted. McCormick § 225; 5 Wigmore § 1361, 6 id. § 1766. If the significance of an offered statement lies solely in the fact that it was made, no issue is raised as to the truth of anything asserted, and the statement is not hearsay. * * * The effect is to exclude from hearsay the entire category of ‘verbal acts’ and ‘verbal parts of an act,’ in which the statement itself affects the legal rights of the parties or is a circumstance bearing on conduct affecting their rights.

The definition of hearsay must, of course, be read with reference to the definition of statement set forth in subdivision (a).

Testimony given by a witness in the course of court proceedings is excluded since there is compliance with all the ideal conditions for testifying.”

This definition of hearsay is consistent with the definitions used by North Carolina courts. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 138 (1982). With respect to the definition of hearsay excluding “verbal acts” from the hearsay ban, see

Brandis,

§ 141.

Subdivision (d)(1) of Fed. R. Evid. 801 departs markedly from the common law in North Carolina by excluding from the hearsay ban several statements that come within the common law definition of hearsay. Accordingly, the language of Fed. R. Evid. 801(d), which provides that in certain circumstances prior inconsistent statements, prior consistent statements, and out-of-court identifications are not hearsay, was deleted. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 46 (prior inconsistent statements), §§ 51 and 52 (prior consistent statements);

State

v.

Neville,

175 N.C. 751

(1918) (identification).

Subdivision (d)(2) of Fed. R. Evid. 801 excludes certain admissions of a party-opponent from the hearsay ban by stating that such statements are not hearsay. Subdivision (d) of Rule 801 achieves the same result in a manner consistent with current North Carolina practice by providing that such a statement may be admitted as an exception to the hearsay rule.

Subdivision (d) specifies five categories of statements for which the responsibility of a party is considered sufficient to justify reception in evidence against the party.

With respect to category (A), a party’s own statement is the classic example of an admission.

Category (A) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§§ 167, 176 (1982).

With respect to category (B), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“Under established principles an admission may be made by adopting or acquiescing in the statement of another. While knowledge of contents would ordinarily be essential, this is not inevitably so: ‘X is a reliable person and knows what he is talking about.’ See McCormick § 246, p. 527, n. 15. Adoption or acquiescence may be manifested in any appropriate manner. When silence is relied upon, the theory is that the person would, under the circumstances, protest the statement made in his presence, if untrue. The decision in each case calls for an evaluation in terms of probable human behavior. In civil cases, the results have generally been satisfactory. In criminal cases, however, troublesome questions have been raised by decisions holding that failure to deny is an admission: the inference is a fairly weak one, to begin with; silence may be motivated by advice of counsel or realization that ‘anything you say may be used against you’; unusual opportunity is afforded to manufacture evidence; and encroachment upon the privilege against self-incrimination seems inescapably to be involved. However, recent decisions of the Supreme Court relating to custodial interrogation and the right to counsel appear to resolve these difficulties. Hence the rule contains no special provisions concerning failure to deny in criminal cases.”

Admission of a statement of which a party has adopted is in accord with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 179 (1982).

With respect to category (C), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“No authority is required for the general proposition that a statement authorized by a party to be made should have the status of an admission by the party. However, the question arises whether only statements to third persons should be so regarded, to the exclusion of statements by the agent to the principal. The rule is phrased broadly so as to encompass both. While it may be argued that the agent authorized to make statement to his principal does not speak for him, Morgan, Basic Problems of Evidence 273 (1962), communication to an outsider has not generally been thought to be an essential characteristic of an admission. Thus a party’s books or records are usable against him, without regard to any intent to disclose to third persons. 5 Wigmore § 1557. See also McCormick § 78, pp. 159-161.”

North Carolina courts currently admit statements when an agent is, in fact, authorized to speak for the principal.
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 169, at 15 (1982). However, it is unclear whether such statements are admissible when the statement was made only to the principal.

Id.

at 17. The rule would clarify North Carolina law by encompassing statements by an agent to the principal or to a third party.

With respect to category (D), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The tradition has been to test the admissibility of statement by agents, as admissions, by applying the usual test of agency. Was the admission made by the agent acting in the scope of his employment? Since few principals employ agents for the purpose of making damaging statements, the usual result was exclusive of the statement. Dissatisfaction with this loss of valuable and helpful evidence has been increasing. A substantial trend favors admitting statements related to a matter within the scope of the agency or employment.”

In
Hubbard
v.

R.R.,

203 N.C. 675

(1932), the Court states:

“What an agent or employee says relative to an act presently being done by him within the scope of his agency or employment is admissible . . . against the principal or employer, but what he says afterwards, and merely narrative of a past occurrence, though his agency or employment may continue as to other matters, or generally, is only hearsay and is not competent as against the principal or employer.”

The North Carolina rule has been the subject of several dissenting opinions and has been criticized by Professor Brandis. See
Branch
v.

Dempsey,

265 N.C. 733

(1965) (Sharp, J., dissenting);

Pearce

v.

Telephone Co.,

299 N.C. 64

(1980) (Copeland, Carlton and Exum, J.J., dissenting);

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 169 (1982). Rule 801(d)(D) would change North Carolina practice and make admissible any statements related to a matter within the scope of the agency or employment. The only additional requirement is that the statement be made during the existence of the relationship.

With respect to category (E), the Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The limitation upon the admissibility of statement of co-conspirators to those made ‘during the course and in furtherance of the conspiracy’ is in the accepted pattern. While the broadened view of agency taken in item (iv) might suggest wider admissibility of statements of co-conspirators, the agency theory of conspiracy is at best a fiction and ought not to serve as a basis for admissibility beyond that already established. * * * The rule is consistent with the position of the Supreme Court in denying admissibility to statements made after the objectives of the conspiracy have either failed or been achieved.
Krulewitch
v.

United States,

336 U.S. 440, 69 S. Ct. 716, 93 L. Ed. 790 (1949);

Wong Sun

v.

United States,

371 U.S. 471, 490, 83 S. Ct. 407, 9 L. Ed. 2d. 441 (1963).” Rule 801(d)(E) is in accord with North Carolina practice. See

Brandis on North Carolina Evidence

§ 173 (1982).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “State v. Smith: Facilitating the Admissibility of Hearsay Statements in Child Sexual Abuse Cases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1352 (1986).

For note, “State v. Stafford: Rape Trauma Syndrome and the Admissibility of Statements Made by Rape Victims,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1364 (1986).

For article, “Guilt by Intuition: The Insufficiency of Prior Inconsistent Statements To Convict,” see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1986).

For article, “Not So ‘Firmly Rooted’: Exceptions to the Confrontation Clause,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1987).

For note, “Admission of the Unthinkable: Hearsay Exceptions and Statements Made by Sexually Abused Children—State v. Smith,” see 9 Campbell L. Rev. 437 (1987).

For note on the admissibility of a criminal defendant’s hypnotically refreshed testimony, see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 311 (1988).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For note, “State v. Alston: North Carolina Continues to Broaden its Mind to Admissibility of a Victim’s Out-of-Court Statements Under the Rule 803(3) Hearsay Exception in Criminal Cases,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1327 (1997).

For recent development, “The Defense Calls ... the Accuser? State v. Brigman and How the North Carolina Court of Appeals Misconstrued Crawford’s Application to Available Witnesses,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2082 (2006).

For article, “Free Speech and the Law of Evidence,” see 68 Duke L.J. 640 (2019).

Rule 802.
Hearsay rule.

Hearsay is not admissible except as provided by statute or by these rules.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 802 except that the phrase “by statute or by these rules” is used in lieu of the phrase “by these rules or by other rules prescribed by the Supreme Court pursuant to statutory authority or by Act of Congress.”

Rule 802 provides for the standard exclusion of hearsay evidence; hearsay is simply inadmissible unless an exception is applicable. This is in accord with North Carolina practice. Unless an exception to the hearsay rule is provided in these rules, the courts are not free to create new hearsay exceptions by adjudication. Rules 803(24) and 804(b)(5) allow for the admission of evidence in particular cases, but not for more general policy formulation.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “State v. Smith: Facilitating the Admissibility of Hearsay Statements in Child Sexual Abuse Cases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1352 (1986).

For note, “State v. Stafford: Rape Trauma Syndrome and the Admissibility of Statements Made by Rape Victims,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1364 (1986).

For note, “Admission of the Unthinkable: Hearsay Exceptions and Statements Made by Sexually Abused Children—State v. Smith,” see 9 Campbell L. Rev. 437 (1987).

For article, “Confrontation and Hearsay: New Wine in An Old Bottle,” 16 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (1994).

For article, “Issues Once Moot: The Other Evidentiary Objections to the Admission of Exculpatory Polygraph Examinations,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1045 (1997).

For note, “State v. Alston: North Carolina Continues to Broaden its Mind to Admissibility of a Victim’s Out-of-Court Statements Under the Rule 803(3) Hearsay Exception in Criminal Cases,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1327 (1997).

For note, “Not-So-Secrets? The State of the Attorney-Client Privilege in North Carolina in the Wake of In re Investigation of Death of Eric Miller and Crawford v. Washington,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1591 (2005).

For recent development, “The Defense Calls ... the Accuser? State v. Brigman and How the North Carolina Court of Appeals Misconstrued Crawford’s Application to Available Witnesses,” see 84 N.C. L. Rev. 2082 (2006).